Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DIAPER DISTRIBUTION GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $553,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $553,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to the Diaper Bank of Minnesota for the diaper distribution grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.42. This amount is added to the base. new text end